Louisiana, session 2026, SB513.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2225.2.6(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2225.2.6. Design-build contracts; authorized use by airports; air traffic control
tower and hangar
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a public
airport may use the design-build project delivery method to contract for construction
and design-build of an air traffic control tower or hangar development and
redevelopment project when deemed in the public interest, beneficial to the entity,
and in accordance with the procedures set forth by law. vertical facilities on airport
property, excluding passenger terminal facilities at commercial service airports
and equipment, when deemed in the public interest, beneficial to the entity, and
in accordance with the procedures set forth by law. These facilities could
include but are not limited to education or workforce development facilities,
airport air traffic control towers, parking garages, and aircraft hangars.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.